Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.350

1947 conveyance for arboretum and botanical garden purposes—Description.

There is hereby granted to the University of Washington the following described land, to wit:

Lots two (2) and three (3), Block eleven-A (11-A) of the supplemental map of Lake Washington shorelands, filed September 5, 1916 in the office of the commissioner of public lands, to be used for arboretum and botanical garden purposes and for no other purposes, except as provided in RCW 28B.20.354.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.350. Prior: 1947 c 45 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.310.]